ess.lexc
LEXICON NounPostbase1
0:0        NounInfl;
0:0        AssignValenceVerbEte;
-~sf–ghhalek[how.N][N→XCLM]:~sf–ghhalek  EncliticOrEnd; ! how much N it has!

!-e[N→N]:e                                NounPostbase2; ! Yupikalizer; Allows English-words to be inflected in Yupik
-~sf-w%:(e)nkuk[N→N]:~sf-w%:(e)nkuk      NounPostbase2; ! N and partner; N and associate(s); N and family
-~sf-w%:(e)nkut[N→N]:~sf-w%:(e)nkut      NounPostbase2; ! N and partner; N and associate(s); N and family
-–ghhagh*[N→N]:–ghhagh*                  NounPostbase2; ! little N; small N; bit of N
-~fngiighhagh*[N→N]:~fngiighhagh*        NounPostbase2; ! little N; small N; bit of N
-–ghllag[N→N]:–ghllag                    NounPostbase2; ! big N; large N; lots of N
-–ghnaggagh*[N→N]:–ghnaggagh*            NounPostbase2; ! big N
-–ghrugllag[N→N]:–ghrugllag              NounPostbase2; ! big N; large N
-–ghrug[N→N]:–ghrug                      NounPostbase2; ! big old N; poor old N
-–ghrukutaaghllag[N→N]:–ghrukutaaghllag  NounPostbase2; ! huge N; gigantic N
-–ghrukutaagh[N→N]:–ghrukutaagh          NounPostbase2; ! big N; large N; huge N
-–ghrupag[N→N]:–ghrupag                  NounPostbase2; ! darned old N
-@₁kaghagh[N→N]:@₁kaghagh                NounPostbase2; ! small N
-~–kaghqagh[N→N]:~–kaghqagh              NounPostbase2; ! something to be used as N; future N
-kagh[N→N]:kagh                          NounPostbase2; ! raw material for N
-~–kegtagh[N→N]:~–kegtagh                NounPostbase2; ! one with good N
-~–kenghhagh*[N→N]:~–kenghhagh*          NounPostbase2; ! newly made or newly acquired N
-–krag[N→N]:–krag                        NounPostbase2; ! fancy piece of of N
-–kuvinghagh[N→N]:–kuvinghagh            NounPostbase2; ! remains of N
-kwaagh[N→N]:kwaagh                      NounPostbase2; ! leftover N
-–leg[N→N]:–leg                          NounPostbase2; ! one having N; one with N
-–lghute[N→N]:–lghute                    NounPostbase2; ! lots of N; a number of N; several N; a group of N
-–lghutagh[N→N]:–lghutagh                NounPostbase2; ! place for N; container for N
-–lgute[N→N]:–lgute                      NounPostbase2; ! one with the same N
-–linghagh*[N→N]:–linghagh*              NounPostbase2; ! thing of N
-–llaag[N→N]:–llaag                      NounPostbase2; ! crude N; clumsy N; bad N
-–llegagh*[N→N]:–llegagh*                NounPostbase2; ! crudely made N 
-–llgagh[N→N]:–llgagh                    NounPostbase2; ! one with small N; little one with N
-lluggagh[N→N]:lluggagh                  NounPostbase2; ! dear little meek N
-–lluggagh[N→N]:–lluggagh                NounPostbase2; ! dear little meek N
-llug[N→N]:llug                          NounPostbase2; ! poor quality N; bad N; undesirable N; N not in its ideal state
-–llug[N→N]:–llug                        NounPostbase2; ! poor quality N; bad N; undesirable N; N not in its ideal state
-–lugpigagh[N→N]:–lugpigagh              NounPostbase2; ! fine old N
-–lug[N→N]:–lug                          NounPostbase2; ! old (in age) N
-~fmii[N→N]:~fmii                        NounPostbase2; ! resident of N; inhabitant of N
-~fmig[N→N]:~fmig                        NounPostbase2; ! thing held in one's N 
-~fmiigh[N→N]:~fmiigh                    NounPostbase2; ! thing held in one's N
-–mlaagh[N→N]:–mlaagh                    NounPostbase2; ! little bit of Nor little thing like N
-–mraagh[N→N]:–mraagh                    NounPostbase2; ! little bit of Nor little thing like N
-–mzaagh[N→N]:–mzaagh                    NounPostbase2; ! little bit of Nor little thing like N
-–mleghagh[N→N]:–mleghagh                NounPostbase2; ! little bit of N or little thing like N 
-–mreghagh[N→N]:–mreghagh                NounPostbase2; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
-–mzeghagh[N→N]:–mzeghagh                NounPostbase2; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
-–vlaagh[N→N]:–vlaagh                    NounPostbase2; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
-–vleghagh[N→N]:–vleghagh                NounPostbase2; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
-–vraagh[N→N]:–vraagh                    NounPostbase2; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
-–vreghagh[N→N]:–vreghagh                NounPostbase2; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
-–vzaagh[N→N]:–vzaagh                    NounPostbase2; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
-–vzeghagh[N→N]:–vzeghagh                NounPostbase2; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
-–msiigh[N→N]:–msiigh                    NounPostbase2; ! something like N
-–msuggagh*[N→N]:–msuggagh*              NounPostbase2; ! no N; virtually no N
-–ngeltagh[N→N]:–ngeltagh                NounPostbase2; ! small N; little N
-–ngertagh[N→N]:–ngertagh                NounPostbase2; ! small N; little N
-–ngestagh[N→N]:–ngestagh                NounPostbase2; ! small N; little N
-~%:(ng₁)inagh*[N→N]:~%:(ng₁)inagh*      NounPostbase2; ! only N; just N; exactly N
-~(ng₁)iitagh[N→N]:~(ng₁)iitagh          NounPostbase2; ! protective device for or like N
-ni[N→N]:ni                              NounPostbase2; ! the smell of N; the odor of N; the taste of N
-~f(p/v)allugh[N→N]:~f(p/v)allugh        NounPostbase2; ! one with big N; mostly N
-–penaagh[N→N]:–penaagh                  NounPostbase2; ! homely N; shabby N; dilapidated N; ugly N
-–peragh[N→N]:–peragh                    NounPostbase2; ! small N; makeshift N; not quite correct N
-–perewaagh[N→N]:–perewaagh              NounPostbase2; ! all, only or totally N
-–perug[N→N]:–perug                      NounPostbase2; ! one like N
-–pestaagh[N→N]:–pestaagh                NounPostbase2; ! truly N
-–pig[N→N]:–pig                          NounPostbase2; ! real N; genuine N; authentic N; old-fashioned N
-qagh[N→N]:qagh                          NounPostbase2; ! one to the N
-–qinghagh[N→N]:–qinghagh                NounPostbase2; ! thing of N
-–qligh*[N→N]:–qligh*                    NounPostbase2; ! thing that is far to the N direction
-–qragh[N→N]:–qragh                      NounPostbase2; ! small N; thing like N
-–qrug[N→N]:–qrug                        NounPostbase2; ! good old N; bad old N (paradoxically); troublesome N
-qutagh[N→N]:qutagh                      NounPostbase2; ! device associated with N
-raghagh[N→N]:raghagh                    NounPostbase2; ! brand new N
-raaghagh[N→N]:raaghagh                  NounPostbase2; ! new N
-–raaghinagh*[N→N]:–raaghinagh*          NounPostbase2; ! nothing but N; just N; only N
-raag[N→N]:raag                          NounPostbase2; ! thing like N
-–raagh[N→N]:–raagh                      NounPostbase2; ! new-fangled N (as opposed to traditional style N); modern N
-–rraag[N→N]:–rraag                      NounPostbase2; ! crude N; clumsy N; bad N; shabby N; discarded N
-–siigh[N→N]:–siigh                      NounPostbase2; ! to get lots of N; to gather lots of N
-–sluvegagh[N→N]:–sluvegagh              NounPostbase2; ! little N
-–sngwaaghaq[N→N]:–sngwaaghaq            NounPostbase2; ! tiny N; very small N; very little N
-–squghhagh*[N→N]:–squghhagh*            NounPostbase2; ! very small N; very little N; tiny N
-–squllgagh[N→N]:–squllgagh              NounPostbase2; ! one with small N
-–squgh[N→N]:–squgh                      NounPostbase2; ! small N; little N
-–staghhiinagh*[N→N]:–staghhiinagh*      NounPostbase2; ! only N; each one an N 
-tagh[N→N]:tagh                          NounPostbase2; ! the N part of something; thing of N; acquired N; caught N
-tuqagh[N→N]:tuqagh                      NounPostbase2; ! one that has lots of N
-–tuqagh[N→N]:–tuqagh                    NounPostbase2; ! one that has lots of N
-–vyiigh[N→N]:–vyiigh                    NounPostbase2; ! crude N; makeshift N
-–vziigh[N→N]:–vziigh                    NounPostbase2; ! crude N; makeshift N
-yage[N→N]:yage                          NounPostbase2; ! multitude of N; abundance of N; lots of N
-–yaagh[N→N]:–yaagh                      NounPostbase2; ! short or small N (article of clothing)

LEXICON ProperNoun
Estegragvag            	NounPostbase1; ! former village at the northwest point of Yttygran Island in Chukotka
Laavlaaghmii           	NounPostbase1; ! Saami; Laplander
Pagkwaagh              	NounPostbase1; ! site near the foothills on the back side of Savoonga Mts. or Kukulget Mts.
Quyillegqaatfig       	NounPostbase1; ! time in the fall when Eskimos go to the Chukchi to trade; around late August or early September
Tekeghagh              	NounPostbase1; ! Tikugha Pt. on St. Lawrence Island
LEXICON NounBase
aaghlu                 	NounPostbase1; ! fireball of some sort coming down from mountains (perhaps meteor or comet)
agaghfikutagh          	NounPostbase1; ! clothes hanger; clothespin; peg for hanging things; hook for hanging things
aghqunqagh             	NounPostbase1; ! crest along mountainside; small depression; hole; curve
akeleghraagh           	NounPostbase1; ! area in between
alangqugh              	NounPostbase1; ! ring finger
ameltaarag             	NounPostbase1; ! rare item
angalqaagh             	NounPostbase1; ! game of some sort
anighqute              	NounPostbase1; ! wooly lousewort (Pedicularis lanata)
aqsaghwaagh            	NounPostbase1; ! the back part of man's parka
atkuyaag               	NounPostbase1; ! dress; shirt
ayapghaatagh           	NounPostbase1; ! mitten
elqiileg               	NounPostbase1; ! bird type
estulluyaagh           	NounPostbase1; ! child's skinboot
igamriiqayug           	NounPostbase1; ! illiterate person
iglalqughrug           	NounPostbase1; ! windpipe
ilagaate               	NounPostbase1; ! hymn; song; shaman's song
ingtaghate             	NounPostbase1; ! brace or spreader used between keel and gunwale in building skin boat frame
ivalungqughrug         	NounPostbase1; ! tendon
kakagh                 	NounPostbase1; ! woman's underpants; fancy panties
kanuka                 	NounPostbase1; ! large knife used for butchering whales
kellii                 	NounPostbase1; ! sea; ocean; the ocean
keviigh                	NounPostbase1; ! homemade reindeer sausage
kukrag                	NounPostbase1; ! person who is clumsy and slow to learn or perform
legreghllag            	NounPostbase1; ! nosy person; curious person
makugnegh              	NounPostbase1; ! shed fur or hair of animal
mayeqaate              	NounPostbase1; ! short boot with fold over insole
meraaghinagh           	NounPostbase1; ! open water; nothing but water
naaknaagh              	NounPostbase1; ! aunt, in the sense of one's uncle's wife; bad mother; stepmother through father's remarriage
nalleqligh*            	NounPostbase1; ! relative (kin)
nazikagh               	NounPostbase1; ! de-haired and scraped reindeer skin
nepiigh                	NounPostbase1; ! silence
nughtughagh            	NounPostbase1; ! small shiny fish type; "delta" smelt
nuvulqugnag            	NounPostbase1; ! long-necked or soft-shelled clam (called "red-tip")
pangegh                	NounPostbase1; ! visitor from Chukotka to St. Lawrence Island
pengugh                	NounPostbase1; ! mound; rounded hill
puugllug               	NounPostbase1; ! suds; foam or froth; flotsam; residue of melted fat of a sea mammal
qaneleg                	NounPostbase1; ! fortune teller; one who casts spells
qengesqugh             	NounPostbase1; ! limpet
qughaghtagh            	NounPostbase1; ! hanging mat made of grass used for insulation in a tent
risqetkugh             	NounPostbase1; ! woman's kneehigh boot made from suede
sayuute                 NounPostbase1; ! song used for a traditional dance
sughu                  	NounPostbase1; ! woman's windparka made of dried walrus gut decorated with reddened strips of unborn seal skin
tala                   	NounPostbase1; ! dollar
tengengaaghagh         	NounPostbase1; ! young bird ready to fly
tuqumyighaqagh         	NounPostbase1; ! one who is halfdead; unconscious one
umegnegh               	NounPostbase1; ! blizzard
uuslegh                	NounPostbase1; ! pressure ridge; piledup ice; ice jam
yughaghvig             	NounPostbase1; ! church
